Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1619
High hazard potential, defined.

High hazard potential means a hazard potential classification such that failure or misoperation of the dam resulting in loss of human life is probable.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 19.